test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-a_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - luččâ:
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: luuj̣â
    luččâ+N+Sg+Acc: luuj̣â
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: luučân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: luuj̣âst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: luuj̣áin
    luččâ+N+Sg+Abe: luˊjâttáá
    luččâ+N+Ess: luččân
    luččâ+N+Par: luččâd
    luččâ+N+Pl+Nom: luuj̣ah
    luččâ+N+Pl+Gen: [luuj̣âi, luj̣âi]
    luččâ+N+Pl+Acc: luuj̣âid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Ill: luuj̣áid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Loc: luuj̣âin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Com: luˊjâiguin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: luˊjâittáá

  Noun - kurkkâ:
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurkkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurkân
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurkâst
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Com: kurkkáin
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊrkâttáá
    kurkkâ+N+Ess: kurkkân
    kurkkâ+N+Par: kurkkâd
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurkah
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurkâi, kuˊrkâi]
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurkâid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: kurkkáid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurkâin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊrkâiguin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊrkâittáá

  Noun - mirkkâ:
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: mirkkâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: miirkân
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: miirhâst
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Com: mirháin
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: miˊrhâttáá
    mirkkâ+N+Ess: mirkkân
    mirkkâ+N+Par: mirkkâd
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: miirhah
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [miirhâi, miˊrhâi]
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: miirhâid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: mirháid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: miirhâin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Com: miˊrhâiguin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: miˊrhâittáá

  Noun - merkkâ:
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: merkkâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: meerkân
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: meerhâst
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Com: merháin
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: meˊrhâttáá
    merkkâ+N+Ess: merkkân
    merkkâ+N+Par: merkkâd
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: meerhah
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [meerhâi, meˊrhâi]
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: meerhâid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: merháid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: meerhâin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Com: meˊrhâiguin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: meˊrhâittáá


  Noun - lavkkâ:
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lavkkâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: laavkân
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavhâst
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Com: lavháin
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊvhâttáá
    lavkkâ+N+Ess: lavkkân
    lavkkâ+N+Par: lavkkâd
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavhah
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavhâi, laˊvhâi]
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavhâid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavháid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavhâin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊvhâiguin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊvhâittáá

  Noun - korkkâ:
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: korkkâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: koorkân
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorhâst
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Com: korháin
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊrhâttáá
    korkkâ+N+Ess: korkkân
    korkkâ+N+Par: korkkâd
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorhah
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorhâi, koˊrhâi]
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorhâid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: korháid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorhâin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊrhâiguin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊrhâittáá

  Noun - tulkkâ:
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: tulkkâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulkân
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulhâst
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Com: tulháin
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: tuˊlhâttáá
    tulkkâ+N+Ess: tulkkân
    tulkkâ+N+Par: tulkkâd
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulhah
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulhâi, tuˊlhâi]
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulhâid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: tulháid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulhâin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Com: tuˊlhâiguin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: tuˊlhâittáá

  Noun - kaastâ:
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Nom: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Gen: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Acc: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Ill: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Loc: kaastâst
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Com: kastáin
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Abe: kaˊstâttáá
    kaastâ+N+Ess: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Par: kaastâd
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Nom: kaastah
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kaastâi, kastâi]
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Acc: kaastâid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Ill: kastáid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Loc: kaastâin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Com: kaˊstâiguin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊstâittáá

  Noun - saahâ:
    saahâ+N+Sg+Nom: saahâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Gen: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Acc: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Ill: saahân
    saahâ+N+Sg+Loc: saaṿâst
    saahâ+N+Sg+Com: savváin
    saahâ+N+Sg+Abe: saˊṿâttáá
    saahâ+N+Ess: saahân
    saahâ+N+Par: saahâd
    saahâ+N+Pl+Nom: saaṿah
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: saaṿâi 
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: saˊṿâi
    saahâ+N+Pl+Acc: saaṿâid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Ill: savváid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Loc: saaṿâin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Com: saˊṿâiguin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Abe: saˊṿâittáá
    
    Noun - vuojâ:
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuoj̣â
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuoj̣ân
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuojâst
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Com: vuojáin
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuoˊjâttáá
    vuojâ+N+Ess: vuoijân
    vuojâ+N+Par: vuoijâd
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuojah
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuojâi,vuoˊjâi]
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuojâid
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuojáid 
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuojâin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊjâiguin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊjâittáá

    Noun - njuolâ:
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuoḷâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuoḷân
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuoˊlâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Ess: njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Par: njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuolâi,njuoˊlâi]
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoláid 
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuolâin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com: njuoˊlâiguin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuoˊlâittáá
    
    Noun - suonâ:
    suonâ+N+Sg+Nom: suoṇâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Gen: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Acc: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Ill: suoṇân
    suonâ+N+Sg+Loc: suonâst
    suonâ+N+Sg+Com: suonáin
    suonâ+N+Sg+Abe: suoˊnâttáá
    suonâ+N+Ess: suonnân
    suonâ+N+Par: suonnâd
    suonâ+N+Pl+Nom: suonah
    suonâ+N+Pl+Gen: [suonâi,suoˊnâi]
    suonâ+N+Pl+Acc: suonâid
    suonâ+N+Pl+Ill: suonáid 
    suonâ+N+Pl+Loc: suonâin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Com: suoˊnâiguin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊnâittáá
    
    Noun - muorâ:
    muorâ+N+Sg+Nom: muoṛâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Gen: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Acc: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Ill: muoṛân
    muorâ+N+Sg+Loc: muorâst
    muorâ+N+Sg+Com: muoráin
    muorâ+N+Sg+Abe: muoˊrâttáá
    muorâ+N+Ess: muorrân
    muorâ+N+Par: muorrâd
    muorâ+N+Pl+Nom: muorah
    muorâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muorâi,muoˊrâi]
    muorâ+N+Pl+Acc: muorâid
    muorâ+N+Pl+Ill: muoráid 
    muorâ+N+Pl+Loc: muorâin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Com: muoˊrâiguin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Abe: muoˊrâittáá
    
    Noun - tullâ:
    tullâ+N+Sg+Nom: tullâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuuḷân
    tullâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulâst
    tullâ+N+Sg+Com: tulláin
    tullâ+N+Sg+Abe: tuˊlâttáá
    tullâ+N+Ess: tullân
    tullâ+N+Par: tullâd
    tullâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulah
    tullâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulâi, tuˊlâi]
    tullâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulâid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Ill: tulláid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulâin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Com: tuˊlâiguin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Abe: tuˊlâittáá
    
    Noun - kunnâ:
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Nom: kunnâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuuṇân
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuunâst
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Com: kunnáin
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊnâttáá
    kunnâ+N+Ess: kunnân
    kunnâ+N+Par: kunnâd
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuunah
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuunâi, kuˊnâi]
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuunâid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Ill: kunnáid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuunâin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊnâiguin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊnâittáá
    
    Noun - korrâ:
    korrâ+N+Sg+Nom: korrâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kooṛân
    korrâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorâst
    korrâ+N+Sg+Com: korráin
    korrâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊrâttáá
    korrâ+N+Ess: korrân
    korrâ+N+Par: korrâd
    korrâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorah
    korrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorâi, koˊrâi]
    korrâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorâid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Ill: korráid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorâin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊrâiguin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊrâittáá

Noun - čiŋŋâ:
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: čiŋŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: čiiŋ̣ân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: čiiŋâst
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: čiŋŋáin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: čiˊŋâttáá
    čiŋŋâ+N+Ess: čiŋŋân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Par: čiŋŋâd
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: čiiŋah
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čiiŋâi, čiˊŋâi]
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: čiiŋâid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: čiŋŋáid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: čiiŋâin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: čiˊŋâiguin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: čiˊŋâittáá
    
    Noun - juŋŋâ:
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: juŋŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: juuŋ̣ân
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: juuŋâst
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: juŋŋáin
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: juˊŋâttáá
    juŋŋâ+N+Ess: juŋŋân
    juŋŋâ+N+Par: juŋŋâd
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: juuŋah
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [juuŋâi, juˊŋâi]
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: juuŋâid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: juŋŋáid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: juuŋâin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: juˊŋâiguin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: juˊŋâittáá

    Noun - vaarâ:
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Nom: vaaṛâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaarâ
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaaṛân
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaarâst
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Com: vaaráin
    vaarâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaˊrâttáá
    vaarâ+N+Ess: vaarrân
    vaarâ+N+Par: vaarrâd
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaarah
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Gen: vaarâi 
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Gen: vaˊrâi
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaarâid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaaráid
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaarâin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Com: vaˊrâiguin
    vaarâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaˊrâittáá
    
    Noun - laahâ:
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laahâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laaṿâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laaṿâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laaṿâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: lavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊṿâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laaṿah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laaṿâi 
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laˊṿâi
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laaṿâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laaṿâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊṿâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊṿâittáá
    
    Noun - viehâ:
    viehâ+N+Sg+Nom: viehâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Gen: vieṿâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Acc: vieṿâ
    viehâ+N+Sg+Ill: viehân
    viehâ+N+Sg+Loc: vieṿâst
    viehâ+N+Sg+Com: vievváin
    viehâ+N+Sg+Abe: vieˊṿâttáá
    viehâ+N+Ess: viehân
    viehâ+N+Par: viehâd
    viehâ+N+Pl+Nom: vieṿah
    viehâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vieṿâi,vieˊṿâi]
    viehâ+N+Pl+Acc: vieṿâid
    viehâ+N+Pl+Ill: vievváid 
    viehâ+N+Pl+Loc: vieṿâin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Com: vieˊṿâiguin
    viehâ+N+Pl+Abe: vieˊṿâittáá
    
    Noun - mielgâ:
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Nom: mielˊgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Ill: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâst
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Com: mielˊgáin
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Abe: mieˊlgâttáá
    mielgâ+N+Ess: mielˊgân
    mielgâ+N+Par: mielˊgâd
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Nom: mielgah
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [mielgâi, mieˊlgâi]
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Ill: mielˊgáid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Com: mieˊlgâiguin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Abe: mieˊlgâittáá
